Utah statutes.
73-27-103.    Duties of commission.

The commission shall consider and make recommendations to the Legislature and governor on the following issues:

(1)  how the water needs of the state's growing municipal and industrial sectors will be met;

(2)  what the impact of federal regulations and legislation will be on the ability of the state to manage and develop its compacted water rights;

(3)  how the state will fund water projects;

(4)  whether the state should become an owner and operator of water projects;

(5)  how the state will encourage the implementation of water conservation programs; and

(6)  other water issues of statewide importance.

